Maryland, session 2025, HB0922.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–1E–17.
(d) A sports wagering licensee or sports wagering operator that advertises in the
State [may] SHALL contract with an independent evaluator licensed under subsection (b)
of this section to evaluate and rate the sports wagering licensee’s sports wagering content,
sports wagering experts, sports wagering influencers, and content partners.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0922*